Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.090

Amendment of articles—Procedure.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the board of directors of a bank may, by majority vote, amend the bank's articles of incorporation without shareholder action as follows:

(1) If the bank has only one class of shares outstanding, to provide, change, or eliminate any provision with respect to the par value of any class of shares;

(2) To delete the name and address of the initial directors;

(3) If the bank has only one class of shares outstanding, solely to change the number of authorized shares to effectuate a split of, or stock dividend in, the bank's own shares, or solely to do so and to change the number of authorized shares in proportion thereto;

(4) To change the bank's name; or

(5) To make any other change expressly permitted by this title to be made without shareholder action.

Other amendments to a bank's articles of incorporation, in a manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this title, require the affirmative vote of the stockholders representing two-thirds of each class of shares entitled to vote under the terms of the shares at a regular meeting, or special meeting duly called for that purpose in the manner prescribed by the bank's bylaws. No amendment shall be made whereby a bank becomes a trust company unless such bank first receives permission from the director.

[ 2014 c 37 s 163. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 47; 1994 c 92 s 54; 1987 c 420 s 3; 1986 c 279 s 28; 1965 c 140 s 3; 1955 c 33 s 30.08.090; prior: 1923 c 115 s 7; 1917 c 80 s 26; RRS s 3233. Formerly RCW 30.08.090.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.